apertium-pl-csb.csb.dix
    <pardef n="t/o__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>é</l>
          <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>é</l>
          <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>é</l>
          <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>é</l>
          <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>é</l>
          <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>égò</l>
          <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>égô</l>
          <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ego</l>
          <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>egò</l>
          <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>égò</l>
          <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>égô</l>
          <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ego</l>
          <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>egò</l>
          <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>égò</l>
          <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>égô</l>
          <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ego</l>
          <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>egò</l>
          <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>éj</l>
          <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ej</l>
          <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>égò</l>
          <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>égô</l>
          <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ego</l>
          <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ich</l>
          <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ich</l>
          <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ich</l>
          <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ich</l>
          <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ich</l>
          <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>emu</l>
          <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>emu</l>
          <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>emu</l>
          <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>éj</l>
          <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ej</l>
          <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>emu</l>
          <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>im</l>
          <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>im</l>
          <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>im</l>
          <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>im</l>
          <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>im</l>
          <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>égò</l>
          <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>égô</l>
          <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ego</l>
          <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>egò</l>
          <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>égò</l>
          <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>égô</l>

    <e lm="to"><i>t</i><par n="t/o__det"/></e>
    <e lm="no"><i>n</i><par n="t/o__det"/></e>
